Maine, session 132, LD84.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1711-C, sub-§6, ¶U, as amended by PL 2021, c. 398, Pt.
MMMM, §4, is further amended to read:
U. To a panel coordinator of the maternal, fetal and infant mortality review panel
pursuant to section 261, subsection 4, paragraph B‑1 for the purposes of reviewing
health care information of a deceased person and a mother of a child who died within
one year of birth, including fetal deaths after 28 weeks of gestation. For purposes of
this paragraph, "panel coordinator" has the same meaning as in section 261, subsection
1, paragraph E and "deceased person" has the same meaning as in section 261,
subsection 1, paragraph B; and
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §1711-C, sub-§6, ¶V, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 398, Pt.
MMMM, §5, is amended to read:
V. To a panel coordinator of the Aging and Disability Mortality Review Panel pursuant
to section 264, subsection 5, paragraph B, subparagraph (4) for the purposes of
reviewing health care information of an adult receiving services who is deceased, in
accordance with section 264, subsection 5, paragraph A. For purposes of this
paragraph, "panel coordinator" has the same meaning as in section 264, subsection 2,
paragraph B.; and
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §1711-C, sub-§6, ¶W is enacted to read:
W. To the medical director of the Office of Child and Family Services or a child and
adolescent psychiatric consultant or nurse consultant employed by the Office of Child
and Family Services, or to case aide staff when acting under the direction of the medical
director or a child and adolescent psychiatric consultant or nurse consultant employed
by the Office of Child and Family Services, for the exclusive purpose of coordinating
health care of an individual who has not attained 18 years of age and is in the
department's custody pursuant to chapter 1071. The department shall request records
directly from the individual's providers. Disclosure under this paragraph may include
allowing access to health information from a state-designated statewide health
Page 1 - 132LR0269(03)

information exchange. Information accessed through a state-designated statewide
health information exchange may be used only for understanding and providing
continuity of treatment with regard to any current health conditions, medications and
immediate medical needs of the individual.
Page 2 - 132LR0269(03)